Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6293.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 27A NURSING RECRUITMENT PROGRAM Sec. 2731. (1) As used in this part: (a) "MiNURSES advisory commission" or "advisory commission" means the MiNURSES advisory commission created in section 2738. (b) "MiNURSES program" or "program" means the Michigan nurses in urban, rural, and socioeconomically challenged settings program created in section 2733. (c) "Nurse" means all of the following: (i) An advanced practice registered nurse as that term is defined in section 17201. (ii) A registered professional nurse as that term is defined in section 17201. (iii) An individual who is licensed to practice as a licensed practice nurse under part 172 (d) "Primary care" means the specialties of family practice, internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics, psychiatry, or emergency medicine. (e) "Rural or urban underserved area" means a geographic area, population group, or health facility designated by the department under section 2737. (f) "Service obligation" means a contractual obligation meeting the requirements of section 2735. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 2733. (1) The Michigan nurses in urban, rural, and socioeconomically challenged settings program is created in the department to increase the recruitment, placement, and retention of nurses practicing primary care in rural or urban underserved areas. (2) In operating the MiNURSES program, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Work with health facilities to support the funding for new positions for nurses who practice primary care in rural or urban underserved areas. (b) Recruit and place nurses in rural or urban underserved areas, as provided in this part. (c) Engage in activities to promote the MiNURSES program. (d) Fulfill other department functions as provided in this part. Sec. 2735. (1) The department shall administer the MiNURSES program to provide nurses with assistance with repaying loans as a result of attending nursing programs for the training of nurses or to provide scholarships to supplement the costs of working in rural or urban underserved areas. The department may each year pay all or part of an expense or scholarship described in this subsection. The department shall pay an expense or scholarship only for a nurse who has entered into a service obligation with the department. The service obligation must be in writing and must include all of the following: (a) That the nurse will engage in the full-time practice of primary care in a rural or urban underserved area to which the nurse is assigned by the department for a period of 2 years. (b) The amount the department shall pay on behalf of the nurse and the amount payable for each year of service. (2) An expense or scholarship paid on behalf of a nurse under subsection (1) for fulfilling a service obligation must be paid in a lump sum at the completion of each year of the service obligation. Sec. 2737. (1) The department shall develop criteria for identifying and designating a geographic area, population group, or health facility as a rural or urban underserved area of this state. In developing the criteria, the department shall consider the needs of rural and urban areas. (2) On the basis of the criteria set forth in subsection (1), the department shall identify and designate geographic areas, population groups, and health facilities in this state as rural or urban underserved areas for 1 or more nurses under the MiNURSES program. (3) The department shall exercise the department's discretion in selecting a rural or urban underserved area for the assignment of a nurse. The department may establish guidelines for priority among rural or urban underserved areas when assigning nurses to those areas. Sec. 2738. (1) The MiNURSES advisory commission is created in the department. The MiNURSES advisory commission must consist of the following members, appointed by the director as follows: (a) One representative from the Michigan Primary Care Association. (b) One representative from the Michigan Center for Rural Health. (c) Other individuals as the department considers necessary or appropriate. (2) The director shall appoint the first members of the advisory commission. (3) The term of a member of the advisory commission is 3 years or until a successor is appointed under subsection (1), whichever is later. (4) If a vacancy occurs on the advisory commission, the director shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (5) The director may remove a member of the advisory commission for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (6) The director shall call the first meeting of the advisory commission. At the first meeting, the advisory commission shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that the advisory commission considers necessary or appropriate. The advisory commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of a majority of the members. (7) A majority of the members of the advisory commission constitute a quorum for transacting business. An agreement of a majority of the members of the advisory commission serving is required for any action of the advisory commission. (8) The advisory commission shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (9) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the advisory commission in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (10) A member of the advisory commission is not entitled to compensation for service on the advisory commission, but a member may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving pursuant to section 1216. (11) The advisory commission shall make recommendations to the department on the MiNURSES program. Sec. 2739. (1) The MiNURSES program fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for the purpose of implementing this part. Sec. 2740. (1) The department, after considering any recommendations from the MiNURSES advisory commission, shall promulgate rules to implement this part. (2) The department shall publish an annual report on the MiNURSES program and submit a copy of the report to the governor, the standing committees in the senate and the house of representatives responsible for health policy, and the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, including the appropriations committee on the department's budget. The department shall also post the report on the department's website in an area available to the public. The report must include at least all of the following information: (a) The cost-effectiveness of the MiNURSES program and how the department determined the cost-effectiveness of the program. (b) The successes of the MiNURSES program and challenges of the program. (c) Recommendations on changes to the MiNURSES program.